Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB716.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 17.500 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 17.500 to 17.580:
(1) "Approved provider" means a mental health professional licensed or certified in
Kentucky whose scope of practice includes providing mental health treatment
services and who is approved by the Sex Offender Risk Assessment Advisory
Board, under administrative regulations promulgated by the board, to provide
comprehensive sex offender presentence evaluations or treatment to adults and
youthful offenders, as defined in KRS 600.020;
(2) "Cabinet" means the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;
(3) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, "criminal offense
against a victim who is a minor" means any of the following offenses if the
victim is under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of the commission of the
offense:
1. Kidnapping, as set forth in KRS 509.040, except by a parent;
2. Unlawful imprisonment, as set forth in KRS 509.020, except by a
parent;
3. Sex crime;
4. Promoting a sexual performance of a minor, as set forth in KRS
531.320;
5. Human trafficking involving commercial sexual activity, as set forth in
KRS 529.100;
6. Promoting human trafficking involving commercial sexual activity, as
set forth in KRS 529.110;
7. Promoting prostitution, as set forth in KRS 529.040, when the defendant
advances or profits from the prostitution of a person under the age of
Page 1 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
eighteen (18);
8. Use of a minor in a sexual performance, as set forth in KRS 531.310;
9. Sexual abuse, as set forth in KRS 510.120 and 510.130;
10. Unlawful transaction with a minor in the first degree, as set forth in KRS
530.064(1)(a);
11. Any offense involving a minor or depictions of a minor, as set forth in
KRS Chapter 531;
12. Any attempt to commit any of the offenses described in subparagraphs
1. to 11. of this paragraph;
13. Solicitation to commit any of the offenses described in subparagraphs 1.
to 11. of this paragraph; or
14. Any offense from another state or territory, any federal offense, or any
offense subject to a court martial of the United States Armed Forces,
which is similar to any of the offenses described in subparagraphs 1. to
13. of this paragraph.
(b) Conduct which is criminal only because of the age of the victim shall not be
considered a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor if the
perpetrator was under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of the commission
of the offense;
(4) "Law enforcement agency" means any lawfully organized investigative agency,
sheriff's office, police unit, or police force of federal, state, county, urban-county
government, charter county, city, consolidated local government, or a combination
of these, responsible for the detection of crime and the enforcement of the general
criminal federal or state laws;
(5) "Registrant" means:
(a) Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older at the time of the offense or
any youthful offender, as defined in KRS 600.020, who has committed:
Page 2 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
1. A sex crime; or
2. A criminal offense against a victim who is a minor;[ or]
(b) Any person required to register under KRS 17.510;[ or]
(c) Any sexually violent predator; or
(d) Any person whose sexual offense has been diverted pursuant to KRS 533.250,
until the diversionary period is successfully completed;
(6) "Registrant information" means:
(a) The registrant's:
1. [the ]Name, including any lawful name change together with the
registrant's previous name;[,]
2. Social Security number;[,]
3. Age;[,]
4. Race;[,]
5. Sex;[,]
6. Date of birth;[,]
7. Height, weight, and hair and eye color;[,]
8. Fingerprints, palm prints, DNA sample, and a photograph;[,]
9. Aliases used;[,]
10. Residence; and[,]
11. Motor vehicle operator's license number as well as any other
government-issued identification card numbers, if any;[,]
(b) A brief description of the crime or crimes committed;[, and]
(c) The name and address of any place where the registrant is or will be:
1. A student; and
2. An employee or, if the registrant is or will be employed with no fixed
place of employment, other information describing where the
registrant works or will work with the definiteness possible under the
Page 3 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
circumstances;
(d) Information about and copies of:
1. Each passport the registrant has; and
2. Any document establishing the registrant's immigration status,
including immigration document type and number, if the registrant is
an alien as defined in 8 U.S.C. sec. 1101(a)(3);
(e) For a vehicle, including watercraft, aircraft, and motor vehicles owned or
routinely operated by the registrant:
1. The license plate number, or if a vehicle has no license plate, the
registration number or other identifier;
2. A description of the vehicle, including the make, model, year
manufactured, and color; and
3. An address or other information describing the location where the
vehicle is habitually parked, docked, or otherwise kept;
(f) Information concerning all professional licenses of the registrant that
authorize the registrant to engage in an occupation or carry out a trade or
business;
(g) Designations the registrant uses for purposes of routing or self-
identification in communications, including social media posting; and
(h) Other information the cabinet determines, by administrative regulation, may
be useful in the identification of registrants;
(7) "Residence" means any place where a person sleeps. For the purposes of this
statute, a registrant may have more than one (1) residence. A registrant is required
to register each residence address;
(8) "Sex crime" means:
(a) A felony offense defined in KRS Chapter 510, KRS 529.100 or 529.110
involving commercial sexual activity, 530.020, 530.064(1)(a), 531.310,
Page 4 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
531.320, 531.335, 531.340, 531.365, 531.366, 531.367, or 531.368;
(b) A felony attempt to commit a felony offense specified in paragraph (a) of this
subsection; or
(c) A federal felony offense, a felony offense subject to a court-martial of the
United States Armed Forces, or a felony offense from another state or a
territory where the felony offense is similar to a felony offense specified in
paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(9) "Sexual offender" means any person convicted of, pleading guilty to, or entering an
Alford plea to a sex crime as defined in this section, as of the date the verdict is
entered by the court;
(10) "Sexually violent predator" means any person who has been subjected to
involuntary civil commitment as a sexually violent predator, or a similar
designation, under a state, territory, or federal statutory scheme;
(11) "The board" means the Sex Offender Risk Assessment Advisory Board created
under KRS 17.554;
(12) "Victim" has the same meaning as in KRS 421.500;
(13) "DNA sample" or "deoxyribonucleic acid sample" means a blood or swab specimen
from a person, as prescribed by administrative regulation, that is required to provide
a DNA sample pursuant to KRS 17.170 or 17.510, that shall be submitted to the
Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory for law enforcement
identification purposes and inclusion in law enforcement identification databases;
and
(14) "Authorized personnel" means an agent of state government who is properly trained
in DNA sample collection pursuant to administrative regulation.
Section 2. KRS 17.510 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet shall develop and implement a registration system for registrants which
includes creating a new computerized information file to be accessed through the
Page 5 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
Law Information Network of Kentucky.
(2) A registrant shall, on or before the date of his or her release by the court, the parole
board, the cabinet, or any detention facility, register with the appropriate local
probation and parole office in the county in which he or she intends to reside. The
person in charge of the release shall facilitate the registration process.
(3) Any person required to register pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be
informed of the duty to register by the court at the time of sentencing if the court
grants probation or conditional discharge or does not impose a penalty of
incarceration, or if incarcerated, by the official in charge of the place of
confinement upon release. The court and the official shall require the person to read
and sign any form that may be required by the cabinet, stating that the duty of the
person to register has been explained to the person. The court and the official in
charge of the place of confinement shall require the releasee to complete the
acknowledgment form and the court or the official shall retain the original
completed form. The official shall then send the form to the Sex Offender Registry
Section, Department of Kentucky State Police, Frankfort, Kentucky 40601.
(4) (a) The court or the official shall order the person to register with the appropriate
local probation and parole office which shall obtain the person's registrant
information[fingerprints, palm prints, DNA sample, photograph, and a copy
of his or her motor vehicle operator's license as well as any other government-
issued identification cards, if any].
(b) Thereafter, the registrant shall return to the appropriate local probation and
parole office as required in subsection (14) of this section[not less than one
(1) time every two (2) years in order for a new photograph to be obtained],
and the registrant shall pay the cost of updating the photo for registration
purposes.
(c) Any registrant who has not provided palm prints, a copy of his or her motor
Page 6 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
vehicle operator's license, or a copy of any other government-issued
identification cards, if any, as of July 14, 2018, shall provide the information
to the appropriate local probation and parole office when the registrant reports
as required under subsection (14) of this section[appears] for a new
photograph to be obtained.
(d) Any change to a registrant's information[motor vehicle operator's license
number or any other government-issued identification card] after the
registrant reports as required under subsection (14) of this section[appears]
for a new photograph shall be registered in accordance with subsection (11) of
this section.[ Failure to comply with this requirement shall be punished as set
forth in subsection (12) of this section.]
(5) (a) The appropriate probation and parole office shall send the registration form
containing the registrant information[, fingerprints, palm prints, photograph,
and a copy of his or her motor vehicle operator's license as well as any other
government-issued identification cards, if any,] and any special conditions
imposed by the court or the Parole Board, to the Sex Offender Registry
Section, Department of Kentucky State Police, Frankfort, Kentucky 40601.
The appropriate probation and parole office shall send the DNA sample to the
Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.
(b) The Sex Offender Registry Section, upon request by a state or local law
enforcement agency, shall make available to that agency registrant
information, including a person's fingerprints and photograph, where
available, as well as any special conditions imposed by the court or the Parole
Board.
(c) Any employee of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet who disseminates, or
does not disseminate, registrant information in good-faith compliance with the
Page 7 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
requirements of this subsection shall be immune from criminal and civil
liability for the dissemination or lack thereof.
(6) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any person who has
been convicted in a court of any state or territory, a court of the United States,
the District of Columbia, or any federally recognized Indian tribe, or a
similar conviction from a court of competent jurisdiction in any other country,
or a court martial of the United States Armed Forces of a sex crime or
criminal offense against a victim who is a minor and who has been notified of
the duty to register by that state, territory, or court, or who has been
committed as a sexually violent predator under the laws of another state, laws
of a territory, or federal laws, or has a similar conviction from a court of
competent jurisdiction in any other country, shall comply with the registration
requirement of this section, including the requirements of subsection (4) of
this section, and shall register with the appropriate local probation and parole
office in the county of residence within three (3)[five (5)] working days of
relocation. No additional notice of the duty to register shall be required of any
official charged with a duty of enforcing the laws of this Commonwealth.
(b) No person shall be required to register under this subsection for a juvenile
adjudication if such an adjudication in this Commonwealth would not create a
duty to register. This paragraph shall be retroactive.
(7) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c)[(b)] of this subsection, if a person is
required to register under federal law or the laws of another state or territory,
or if the person has been convicted of an offense in a court of the United
States, the District of Columbia, or any federally recognized Indian tribe or
in a court martial of the United States Armed Forces, or under the laws of
another state or territory that would require registration if committed in this
Commonwealth, that person upon changing residence from the other state or
Page 8 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
territory of the United States to the Commonwealth or upon entering the
Commonwealth for employment, to carry on a vocation, or as a student shall
comply with the registration requirement of this section, including the
requirements of subsection (4) of this section, and shall register within three
(3)[five (5)] working days with the appropriate local probation and parole
office in the county of residence, employment, vocation, or schooling. A
person required to register under federal law or the laws of another state or
territory shall be presumed to know of the duty to register in the
Commonwealth.
(b) As used in this subsection:[,]
1. "Employment" or "carry on a vocation" includes employment that is
full-time or part-time for a period exceeding fourteen (14) days or for an
aggregate period of time exceeding thirty (30) days during any calendar
year, whether financially compensated, volunteered, or for the purpose
of government or educational benefit; and[.]
2. [As used in this subsection, ]"Student" means a person who is enrolled
on a full-time or part-time basis, in any public or private educational
institution, including any secondary school, trade or professional
institution, or institution of higher education.
(c)[(b)] No person shall be required to register under this subsection for a
juvenile adjudication if such an adjudication in this Commonwealth would not
create a duty to register. This paragraph shall be retroactive.
(8) The registration form shall be a written statement signed by the person which shall
include registrant information, including an up-to-date photograph of the registrant
for public dissemination.
(9) For purposes of KRS 17.500 to 17.580 and 17.991, a post office box number shall
not be considered an address.
Page 9 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
(10) (a) If a registrant does not have an established and fixed residence of regular
return, he or she shall report in person no less than every thirty (30) days to
the local probation and parole office in the county in which he or she is
present and register the approximate area where he or she can be located.
(b) If the registrant changes his or her location, employer or employer address, or
school or school address to a new county, the person shall notify his or her
current local probation and parole office of the new location on or before the
date of the change of location.
(c) The registrant shall also report in person to the appropriate local probation and
parole office in the county of his or her new location no later than three
(3)[five (5)] working days after the date of the change of location.
(11) (a) If the residence, employer, or school address of any registrant changes, but
the registrant remains in the same county, the person shall appear in person to
register, on or before the date of the change of address, with the appropriate
local probation and parole office in the county in which he or she resides.
(b) 1. If the registrant changes his or her residence, employer, or school to a
new county, the person shall notify his or her current local probation and
parole office of the new residence, employer, or school address on or
before the date of the change of address.
2. The registrant shall also appear in person to register with the
appropriate local probation and parole office in the county of his or her
new residence, employer, or school no later than three (3)[five (5)]
working days after the date of the change of address.
(c) If the registrant's information, other than the registrant information list
under subsection (10)(b) and (c) of this section or paragraph (a) and (b) of
this subsection, changes, [:
1. Motor vehicle operator's license number or any other government-issued
Page 10 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
identification card number of any registrant changes; or
2. Registrant obtains for the first time a motor vehicle operator's license
number or any other government-issued identification card number;
]the registrant shall register the change or addition no later than three (3)[five
(5)] working days after the date of the change or the date of the addition, with
the appropriate local probation and parole office in the county in which he or
she resides.
(d) 1. As soon as a probation and parole office learns of the person's new
address under paragraph (b)1. of this subsection, that probation and
parole office shall notify the appropriate local probation and parole
office in the county of the new address of the effective date of the new
address.
2. As soon as a probation and parole office learns of the person's new
address under paragraph (b)2. of this subsection, that office shall
forward this information as set forth under subsection (5) of this section.
(e) 1. A registrant shall register the following information with the appropriate
local probation and parole office no less than twenty-one (21) days
before traveling outside of the United States:
a. His or her passport number and country of issue;
b. The dates of departure, travel, and return; and
c. The foreign countries, colonies, territories, or possessions that the
registrant will visit.
2. The registrant shall register the following information with the
appropriate local probation and parole office no later than three (3)[five
(5)] working days after the date of his or her return from traveling
outside of the United States:
a. The date he or she departed, traveled, and returned; and
Page 11 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
b. The foreign countries, colonies, territories, or possessions that the
registrant visited.
(12) Any person required to register under this section who knowingly violates any of
the provisions of this section or prior law is guilty of a Class D felony for the first
offense and a Class C felony for each subsequent offense.
(13) Any person required to register under this section or prior law who knowingly
provides false, misleading, or incomplete information is guilty of a Class D felony
for the first offense and a Class C felony for each subsequent offense.
(14) (a) Any person required to register under this section shall appear in person
and allow the appropriate local probation and parole office to take a current
photograph and[cabinet shall] verify the person's addresses, names, motor
vehicle operator's license numbers, [and ]government-issued identification
card, and other registrant information[ numbers of individuals required to
register under this section]. In-person reporting[Verification] shall occur at
least once every ninety (90) days for a person required to register under KRS
17.520(2), semiannually[at least once every calendar year] for a person
required to register under KRS 17.520(3), and at least once every thirty (30)
days for a person who does not have an established and fixed residence of
regular return.
(b) If the cabinet determines that a person has:
1. Moved without providing his or her new address;
2. Failed to notify the local probation and parole office of his or her
presence in a new county without an established and fixed residence of
regular return; or
3. Other registrant information[A new name, motor vehicle operator's
license number, or government-issued identification card number] that
he or she has not provided;
Page 12 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
to the appropriate local probation and parole office or offices as required
under subsection (11)(a), (b), and (c) of this section, the cabinet shall notify
the appropriate local probation and parole office of the new registrant
information[address, name, motor vehicle operator's license number, or
government-issued identification card number used by the person]. The office
shall then forward this information as set forth under subsection (5) of this
section. The cabinet shall also notify the appropriate court, Parole Board, and
appropriate Commonwealth's attorney, sheriff's office, probation and parole
office, corrections agency, and law enforcement agency responsible for the
investigation of the report of noncompliance.
(c) An agency that receives notice of the noncompliance from the cabinet under
paragraph (a) of this subsection:
1. Shall consider revocation of the parole, probation, postincarceration
supervision, or conditional discharge of any person released under its
authority; and
2. Shall notify the appropriate county or Commonwealth's Attorney for
prosecution.
(15) The provisions of subsections (10) and (14) of this section relating to registrants
who do not have an established and fixed residence of regular return shall apply to
any person required to register on or after January 1, 2024.
Section 3. KRS 17.520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A registrant, upon his or her release by the court, the Parole Board, the cabinet, or
any detention facility, shall be required to register for a period of time required
under this section.
(2) [(a) ]Lifetime registration is required for:
(a)[1.] Any person who has been convicted of kidnapping, as set forth in KRS
509.040, when the victim is under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of the
Page 13 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
commission of the offense, except when the offense is committed by a parent;
(b)[2.] Any person who has been convicted of unlawful imprisonment, as set
forth in KRS 509.020, when the victim is under the age of eighteen (18) at the
time of the commission of the offense, except when the offense is committed
by a parent;
(c)[3.] Any person convicted of a sex crime:
1.[a.] Who has one (1) or more prior convictions of a felony criminal offense
against a victim who is a minor; or
2.[b.] Who has one (1) or more prior sex crime convictions;
(d)[4.] Any person who has been convicted of two (2) or more felony criminal
offenses against a victim who is a minor;
(e)[5.] Any person who has been convicted of:
1.[a.] Any degree of rape under KRS Chapter 510[Rape in the first degree
under KRS 510.040];[ or]
2.[b.] Any degree of sodomy under KRS Chapter 510[Sodomy in the first
degree under KRS 510.070];[ and]
3. Incest under KRS 530.020(b) or (c);
4. Sexual abuse in the first degree under KRS 510.110(1)(b)2.; or
5. Any felony attempt to commit, conspiracy to commit, or solicitation to
commit any of the offenses described in subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this
paragraph; and
(f)[6.] Any sexually violent predator.
(3) All other registrants are required to register for twenty-five (25)[twenty (20)] years
following discharge from confinement or twenty-five (25)[twenty (20)] years
following the maximum discharge date on probation, shock probation, conditional
discharge, parole, or other form of early release, whichever period is greater.
(4) If a person required to register under this section is reincarcerated for another
Page 14 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
offense or as the result of having violated the terms of probation, parole,
postincarceration supervision, or conditional discharge, the registration
requirements and the remaining period of time for which the registrant shall register
are tolled during the reincarceration.
(5) A person who has pled guilty, entered an Alford plea, or been convicted in a court
of another state or territory, in a court of the United States, the District of
Columbia, or any federally recognized Indian tribe, or in a court-martial of the
United States Armed Forces who is required to register in Kentucky shall be subject
to registration in Kentucky based on the conviction in the foreign jurisdiction. The
Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of this subsection.
(6) The court shall designate the registration period as mandated by this section in its
judgment and shall cause a copy of its judgment to be mailed to the Information
Services Center, Department of Kentucky State Police, Frankfort, Kentucky 40601.
If the court fails to designate the registration period as required under this
section, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall determine the registration
period as required under this section.
Section 4. KRS 17.546 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) As used in this subsection, "electronic communications" means any transfer of
information, including signs, signals, data, writings, images, sounds, text,
voice, and video, transmitted primarily through the use of electrons or
electromagnetic waves or particles.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, a registrant who has
committed a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor after July 14,
2018, shall not knowingly or intentionally use electronic communications for
communicating with or gathering information about a person who is less than
eighteen (18) years of age.
Page 15 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
(c) It is not a violation of paragraph (b) of this subsection for a registrant to use
electronic communications to communicate with or gather information about
a person under the age of eighteen (18) years of age if:
1. The registrant is a youthful offender who is:
a. Probated or paroled while he or she is under the age of eighteen
(18);
b. Enrolled in an elementary or secondary school education
program;
c. Using the electronic communications as a reasonably necessary
part of the youthful offender's education with the elementary or
secondary school education program; and
d. Not prohibited by court order, or the terms of probation, shock
probation, conditional discharge, parole, or any other form of
early release, from communicating with or gathering
information about a person; or
2. The registrant is the parent of the person[;] and[2. The registrant is] not
prohibited by court order, or the terms of probation, shock probation,
conditional discharge, parole, or any other form of early release, from
communicating with or gathering information about a person.
(2) No registrant shall intentionally photograph, film, or video a minor through
traditional or electronic means without the written consent of the minor's parent,
legal custodian, or guardian unless the registrant is the minor's parent, legal
custodian, or guardian. The written consent required under this subsection shall
state that the person seeking the consent is required to register as a sex offender
under Kentucky law.
(3) Any person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be guilty of a
Class A misdemeanor.
Page 16 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
Section 5. KRS 17.580 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall establish a website[Web site]
available to the public. The website[Web site] shall display:
(a) The registrant information, except for information that identifies a victim,
DNA samples, fingerprints, palm prints, Social Security numbers, motor
vehicle operator's license numbers, the names and addresses where the
registrant is a student, information and copies of passports or documents
establishing the registrant's immigration status, the registrant's occupation,
trade, and business licenses, the registrant's designations used for purposes
of routing or self-identification in internet or telephonic communications,
and government-issued identification card numbers obtained by the
Information Services Center, Department of Kentucky State Police, under
KRS 17.510;
(b) The registrant[sex offender] information, except for information that
identifies a victim, DNA samples, Social Security numbers, the names and
addresses where the registrant is a student or employed, information and
copies of passports or documents establishing the registrant's immigration
status, the registrant's occupation, trade, and business licenses, the
registrant's designations used for purposes of routing or self-identification
in internet or telephonic communications, and vehicle registration data,
obtained by the Information Services Center, Department of Kentucky State
Police, under KRS 17.510 prior to April 11, 2000;[ and]
(c) The registrant's conviction, the elements of the offense for which the
registrant was convicted, whether the registrant is currently on probation or
parole, and whether the registrant is compliant or noncompliant; and
(d) On or before January 1, 2027, in addition to the registrant information
required under this subsection, the registrant information required in
Page 17 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1920
subsection (6)(c)2. and (e) of Section 1 of this Act.
The website[Web site] shall be updated every day except for Saturdays, Sundays,
and state holidays.
(2) The information pertaining to an individual shall be maintained on the website[Web
site] so long as that individual is registered in accordance with KRS 17.500 to
17.580.
(3) The following language shall be prominently displayed on the website[Web site]:
"UNDER KRS 525.070 AND 525.080, USE OF INFORMATION OBTAINED
FROM THIS WEBSITE[WEB SITE] TO HARASS A PERSON IDENTIFIED ON
THIS WEBSITE[WEB SITE] IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE PUNISHABLE BY UP
TO NINETY (90) DAYS IN THE COUNTY JAIL. MORE SEVERE CRIMINAL
PENALTIES APPLY FOR MORE SEVERE CRIMES COMMITTED AGAINST
A PERSON IDENTIFIED ON THIS WEBSITE[WEB SITE]."
(4) (a) Any Department of Kentucky State Police employee who disseminates, or
does not disseminate, registrant information[ or sex offender information] in
good-faith compliance with the requirements of this section shall be immune
from criminal and civil liability for the dissemination or lack thereof.
(b) Any person, including an employee of a sheriff's office, acting in good faith in
disseminating, or not disseminating, information previously disseminated by
the Department of Kentucky State Police shall be immune from criminal and
civil liability for the dissemination or lack thereof.
(5) [The cabinet shall establish a toll-free telephone number for a person to call to learn
the identity of the Web site created in this section and the location of public access
to the Web site in the county where the person resides.
(6) ]In addition to the website[Web site], a local law enforcement agency may provide
personal notification regarding the registrants located in its jurisdiction. Any
notification shall contain the warning specified in subsection (3) of this section.
Page 18 of 18
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed